Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256.4823] INCLUSIVE AND UNIVERSALLY DESIGNED PLAYGROUNDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Requirement. new text end new text begin (a) Playgrounds constructed or substantially renovated using state funding must incorporate principles of universal design to ensure accessible and inclusive play opportunities for individuals with and without disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) Inclusive design features must be incorporated to the maximum extent feasible within the scope of the project and available project funding. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "State funding" means money appropriated by the legislature or distributed through a state-administered grant program, including state fund appropriations and bond proceeds. new text end new text begin (2) "Substantially renovated" means replacing 50 percent or more of play equipment or modifying the play area footprint, surfacing system, or primary accessible routes. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Inclusive playground design considerations. new text end new text begin Playground planning and design under this section must consider accessibility and usability across the entire play environment, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) accessible routes and travel surfaces; new text end new text begin (2) play equipment and play activities designed to support participation by individuals with a wide range of physical, sensory, and cognitive abilities; new text end new text begin (3) sensory play opportunities; new text end new text begin (4) signage and wayfinding features within or directly serving the playground area; new text end new text begin (5) seating, gathering areas, and spaces for supervision by caregivers; new text end new text begin (6) shade, shelter, and environmental comfort features; and new text end new text begin (7) accessible amenities, including restrooms, benches, and picnic areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Universal design principles. new text end new text begin Entities receiving state funding for playground development must incorporate the Seven Principles of Universal Design, as established by the Center for Universal Design at North Carolina State University, or equivalent inclusive design standards. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Design expertise. new text end new text begin Playground design must be reviewed by an individual with demonstrated expertise in playground safety, accessibility, or inclusive design, which may include a certified playground safety inspector or Minnesota certified accessibility specialist. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Implementation guidance. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Natural Resources, in consultation with the Minnesota Council on Disability, may develop guidance and best practices to support implementation of inclusive and universally designed playgrounds receiving state funding. new text end new text begin (b) Implementation guidance developed under this section may include recommendations related to accessible surfacing, ground-level play components, transfer systems, and proportional accessibility based on playground size and complexity. new text end